California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(9) A county Drug Medi-Cal organized delivery system authorized under the California Medi-Cal 2020 Demonstration pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 14184) or a successor demonstration or waiver, as applicable.

(10) Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 5650) of Part 2 of Division 5, solely for purposes of imposition of corrective action plans, monetary sanctions, or temporary withholds pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 5963.04.

(11) Section 12534 of the Government Code.

(12) The Home- and Community-Based Alternatives (HCBA) Waiver pursuant to state law and Section 1915(c) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(c)).

(13) The Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly (PACE) pursuant to Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591).

(u) This section shall become operative
 on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 113.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14197.71.

(a) The department may, at its discretion, align relevant terms of its contract with a Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system with the terms of its contract with a Medi-Cal managed care plan, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101, for those requirements that apply to both entities. Requirements that apply to both entities include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Organization and administration of the plan, including key administrative staffing requirements.

(2) Financial information.

(3) Information
 systems.

(4) Quality improvement systems.

(5) Utilization management.

(6) Provider network.

(7) Provider compensation arrangements.

(8) Provider oversight and monitoring.

(9) Access and availability of services, including, but not limited to, reporting of waitlists for behavioral health services or attesting to no waitlists.

(10) Care coordination and data sharing.

(11) Member services.

(12) Member grievances and appeals data.

(13) Reporting requirements.

(14) Other contractual requirements determined by the department.

(b) The department shall establish minimum quality metrics to measure and evaluate the quality and efficacy of services and programs covered under Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems.

(c) (1) Each Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system shall report annually to the county board of supervisors on utilization, quality, patient care expenditures, and other data as determined by the department.

(2) The board of supervisors shall annually submit an attestation to the department that the county is meeting its obligations to provide realigned programs and services pursuant to clauses (i), (iv), and (v) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (16) of subdivision (f) of Section 30025 of the Government Code.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other state or local law, including, but not limited to, Section 5328 of this code and Sections 11812 and 11845.5 of the Health and Safety Code, the sharing of health, social services, housing, and criminal justice information, records, and other data with and among the department, other state departments, including the State Department of Public Health and the State Department of Social Services, Medi-Cal managed care plans, as
 defined in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101, Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery systems, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 14184.101, counties, health care providers, social services organizations, care coordination and case management teams, and other authorized provider or plan entities, and contractors of all of those entities, shall be permitted to the extent necessary and consistent with federal law.

(2) The department shall issue guidance identifying permissible data-sharing arrangements.

(e) For purposes of this section, the term “Medi-Cal behavioral health delivery system” means an entity or local agency that contracts with the department to provide covered behavioral health Medi-Cal benefits pursuant to Section 14184.400 and Chapter 8.9 (commencing with
 Section 14700) or a county Drug Medi-Cal Organized Delivery System pilot authorized under the CalAIM Terms and Conditions and described in Section 14184.401 or authorized under the Medi-Cal 2020 Demonstration Project Act pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 14184).

(f) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that necessary federal approvals have been obtained and federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(g) The department shall implement this section no later than January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 112.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Sec. 117 of Proposition 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14197.8.

(a) (1) As part of the health care options information posted by the department, in the provider directory that lists accepted Medi-Cal managed care plans, through the Medi-Cal Managed Care Health Care Options internet website and any other applicable mechanisms, the directory shall include skilled nursing facilities as one of the available searchable provider types.

(2) This subdivision shall be implemented in conjunction with implementation of any other provisions relating to the directory described in this subdivision, including, but not limited to, Sections 14016.5, 14087.305, and 14089 of this code, Section 53886 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, and Section 1396a(a)(83) of Title 42 of the United States Code, or their applicable successors.

(b) The department shall annually update the provider directory described in subdivision (a) to ensure that information is accurate and readily accessible to the public.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 14184.101.

(2) “Skilled nursing facility” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 309, Sec. 1.   (SB 250)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

14197.9.

(a) To the extent permitted under federal law, the department shall require a Medi-Cal managed care plan that is not licensed by the Department of Managed Health Care to comply with the applicable requirements in Article 11.9 (commencing with Section 1399.870) of Chapter 2.2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code for the purpose of serving applicable Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(b) For purposes of this section, “Medi-Cal managed care plan” means an individual, organization, or entity that enters into a comprehensive risk contract with the department to provide covered full-scope health care services to enrolled Medi-Cal beneficiaries pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200).

(c) (1) For purposes of implementing the Ensuring Access to Medicaid Services Final Rule, and the Medicaid and Children’s Health Insurance Program Managed Care Access, Finance, and Quality Final Rule, which were published in Volume 89, Number 92 of the Federal Register on May 10, 2024, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the Statewide Information Management
 Manual, the State Administrative Manual, and the State Contracting Manuals, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(3) This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2029.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, plan letters, provider bulletins, information notices, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 418, Sec. 2.   (SB 530)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Regional Burn and Trauma Center Program [14198.1. - 14198.2.]

14198.1.

(a) A hospital or its successor entity, that has received funds pursuant to Section 14198 shall maintain burn and trauma services and continue to provide medical services to beneficiaries of Medi-Cal or a successor program through the year 2028.

(b) The state and a hospital subject to this section shall negotiate in good faith to ensure continued hospital participation in the Medi-Cal program and to ensure adequate access to services for Medi-Cal patients.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 314, Sec. 1.   Effective August 19, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14198.2.

(a) The Regional Burn and Trauma Center Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury, under the administrative control of the State Department of Health Services, for the purposes specified in Section 14198 upon appropriation by the Legislature. Except as otherwise limited by this section, the fund shall consist of the following:

(1) All public moneys transferred by public agencies to the department for deposit into the fund, as permitted under Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the
 Code of Federal Regulations or any other applicable federal medicaid laws.

(2) All private moneys donated by private individuals or entities to the department for deposit in the fund, as permitted under applicable federal medicaid laws and regulations. Private donations may come from private individuals, foundations, or entities that do not meet the definition of a provider entity, as contained in federal regulatory law.

(3) Any amounts appropriated by the Legislature for this program may be transferred to the fund.

(4) Any interest that accrues on amounts in the fund.

(b) Any public moneys transferred by public agencies, or private moneys donated by private individuals or entities to the department for deposit in the fund, shall be expended before any
 state appropriation is utilized as the nonfederal match of the supplemental reimbursement. Total combined funds made available under this section shall not exceed fifty million dollars ($50,000,000). It is the intent of the Legislature that funding from the General Fund shall not exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000).

(c) Unless otherwise prohibited by law, any public or private agency transferring moneys to the fund may utilize for that purpose any revenues, grants, or allocations received from the state for health care programs or purposes. Unless otherwise prohibited by law, a public or private agency may also utilize its general operating funds, or any other public or private moneys or revenues for purposes of transfers to the fund.

(d) The department shall have discretion as to whether to accept moneys offered to the department for deposit in the fund. If the
 department accepts moneys pursuant to this section, the department shall obtain federal matching funds to the full extent permitted by law. The department shall accept only those funds that are certified by the transferring entity or donating entity as qualifying for federal financial participation under the terms of the Medicaid Voluntary Contributions and Provider-Specific Tax Amendments of 1991 (Public Law 102-234), or Section 433.51 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as applicable, and may return any funds transferred or donated in error.

(e) Moneys in the fund shall be used as the source for the nonfederal share of payments to the Regional Burn and Trauma Center to be constructed pursuant to this article. Moneys shall be allocated from the fund by the department and matched by federal funds in accordance with customary Medi-Cal accounting procedures for purposes of payments under subdivision (e). Distributions from the fund
 shall be supplemental to any and all other amounts that this hospital would have received under the selective provider contracting program.

(f) For purposes of recognizing the Regional Burn and Trauma Center replacement costs incurred for services rendered to Medi-Cal beneficiaries, payments from the fund shall be negotiated between the California Medical Assistance Commission and the entity contracting under this article. Payments from the fund shall be used solely for the purposes identified in the contract between the hospital and the state.

(g) The state shall be held harmless for any federal disallowance resulting from this section. A hospital receiving supplemental reimbursement pursuant to this section shall be liable for any reduced federal financial participation resulting from the implementation of this section with respect to that hospital. The state may recoup any
 federal disallowance from the hospital.

(h) Funds available pursuant to this article shall only be used for projects, or for that portion of projects, that are available and accessible to Medi-Cal patients treated under this article or by successor programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 314, Sec. 1.   Effective August 19, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.6. Medicaid Expansion Under The Federal Affordable Care Act [14199.1. - 14199.2.]

14199.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(1) Beginning January 1, 2014, many low-income individuals will be eligible for Medi-Cal coverage pursuant to federal law, as part of health care reform.

(2) In implementing this expansion of Medi-Cal coverage, it is critical to maintain the role of county public hospital health systems that have traditionally served Medi-Cal and uninsured beneficiaries to ensure adequate access to care is available for the new Medi-Cal members, and to preserve the policy goal to support and strengthen traditional safety net providers who treat a high volume of uninsured and Medi-Cal patients.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “County public hospital health system” shall have the meaning provided in subdivision (f) of Section 17612.2.

(2) “Default members” means newly eligible beneficiaries enrolled in each Medi-Cal managed care plan who do not affirmatively select a primary care provider as part of the enrollment process.

(3) “Enrollment target” means the number of newly eligible beneficiaries assigned to primary care providers within a county public hospital health system, not to exceed the number of unduplicated Low Income Health Program and uninsured patient count in the county public hospital health system. The unduplicated patient count shall be certified by the county public hospital health
 system and provided to the department, along with its proposed enrollment target, by November 30, 2013. The county public hospital health system may notify the department of a proposed reduction to its enrollment target based on its capacity to accept new patients. A standardized protocol for determining the target shall be developed by the department in consultation with the public hospital health system counties.

(4) “Low Income Health Program” shall mean the LIHP as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 15909.1.

(5) “Medi-Cal managed care plan” means an organization or entity that enters into a contract with the department pursuant to Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3), Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5), Article 2.81 (commencing with Section 14087.96), Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089), or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200).

(6) “Newly eligible beneficiaries” shall have the meaning provided in subdivision (s) of Section 17612.2.

(7) “Primary care provider” means a primary care physician or nonphysician medical practitioner, medical group, clinic, or a medical home.

(8) “Public hospital health system county” shall have the meaning provided in subdivision (u) of Section 17612.2.

(c) Subject to subdivision (d), default members who reside in a public hospital health system county shall be assigned by each Medi-Cal managed care plan in the county to a primary care provider in accordance with the following:

(1) Throughout the three-year period ending on December 31, 2016, at least 75 percent of default members shall be
 assigned by each Medi-Cal managed care plan to primary care providers within the county public hospital health system until the county public hospital health system meets its enrollment target.

(2) Following the expiration of the three-year period set forth in paragraph (1), at least 50 percent of default members shall be assigned by each Medi-Cal managed care plan to primary care providers within the county public hospital health system until the county public hospital health system meets its applicable enrollment target.

(3) Paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not apply with respect to a county public hospital health system during any time period in which the county public hospital health system meets or exceeds its applicable target. For time periods during which paragraphs (1) and (2) do not apply, default members shall be assigned to primary care providers in the same manner as
 other Medi-Cal members of the Medi-Cal managed care plan who do not affirmatively select primary care providers. Medi-Cal managed care plans shall not modify the assignment procedures due to the default assignment requirements of this section with respect to primary care providers within the county public hospital health system.

(4) In implementing the assignment process set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2), to the extent legally permissible and consistent with federal and state privacy and patient confidentiality laws, each Medi-Cal managed care plan shall first assign to a primary care provider within the county public hospital health system those default members who have accessed care within the county public hospital health system two or more times within the past 12 months. The department and the county public hospital health systems shall work together to share patient information in order to provide the Medi-Cal managed care plans with
 data demonstrating which default members have accessed the county public hospital health system providers prior to assignment to a primary care provider.

(5) If at any time a county public hospital health system notifies a contracted Medi-Cal managed care plan that it has reached its maximum capacity for the assignment of default members, the requirements set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall not apply to the Medi-Cal managed care plan so notified. Once the county public hospital health system notifies a Medi-Cal managed care plan that it has capacity to accept assignment of default members, the requirements set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall apply effective on the first day of the month following that notice.

(6) A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall not assign default members to a primary care provider within the county public hospital health system if that primary care
 provider has notified the Medi-Cal managed care plan that it does not have capacity to accept new patients.

(d) The default process described in this section shall not apply to Low Income Health Program enrollees subject to Section 14005.61.

(e) Nothing set forth in this section shall alter, reduce, or modify in any manner the way in which Medi-Cal managed care plans assign other Medi-Cal members to the county public hospital health systems.

(f) (1) The department shall modify its contracts with the Medi-Cal managed care plans in public hospital health system counties to include the assignment requirements set forth in this section.

(2) Each Medi-Cal managed care plan shall demonstrate and certify that it has contracts or other
 arrangements in place with county public hospital health systems that provide for implementing the requirements of this section. To the extent a Medi-Cal managed care plan is not compliant with any of the requirements of this section, the department shall reduce by 25 percent the default assignment into the Medi-Cal managed care plan with respect to all Medi-Cal beneficiaries, as long as the other Medi-Cal managed care plan or plans in that county have the capacity to receive the additional default membership.

(g) Nothing in this section shall modify the ability of newly eligible beneficiaries to select or change their primary care providers.

(h) The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals to implement the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 358, Sec. 6.   (SB 98)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.2.

(a) Subject to subdivision (e), Medi-Cal managed care plans serving newly eligible beneficiaries, as defined in subdivision (s) of Section 17612.2, shall pay county public hospital health systems, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 17612.2, for services provided to newly eligible beneficiaries in amounts that are no less than the cost of providing those services, including the cost of network and out-of-network services that are charged to or paid for by county public hospital health systems. For purposes of this requirement, the cost of providing services shall mean the amounts, including the federal and nonfederal share of all allowable costs, determined in a manner consistent with the cost claiming protocols developed for the federal Medicaid
 demonstration project authorized under Section 1115 of the Social Security Act entitled the “Bridge to Health Care Reform” (waiver number 11-W-00193/9), including protocols pending federal approval, and under Section 14166.8.

(b) Consistent with federal law, the capitation rates paid to Medi-Cal managed care plans for newly eligible beneficiaries shall be determined to reflect the obligations imposed by subdivision (a). 

(c) (1) Prior to the execution of a change order or contract amendment between the department and a Medi-Cal managed care plan providing for coverage of newly eligible beneficiaries, the Medi-Cal managed care plan shall demonstrate and certify that it has contracts or other arrangements in place with county public hospital health systems that provide for payments for services meeting the requirements of subdivision (a). 

(2) Each year, each Medi-Cal managed care plan shall provide to the department an accounting of the payments made to demonstrate compliance with subdivision (a). To the extent a Medi-Cal managed care plan is not compliant with any of the requirements of this section, the department shall reduce the default assignment into the Medi-Cal managed care plan with respect to all Medi-Cal beneficiaries by 25 percent, as long as the other Medi-Cal managed care plan or plans in the county have the capacity to receive the additional default membership. 

(d) A Medi-Cal managed care plan shall not impose a fee or retention amount, or reduce other payments to a county public hospital health system, that would result in a direct or indirect reduction to the amounts required to be paid under subdivision (a). 

(e) (1) If a nonfederal share is necessary with respect to the capitation rates described in subdivision (b), a county public hospital health system or affiliated governmental entity shall have the right to voluntarily provide intergovernmental transfers for the nonfederal share of expenditures for the capitation rates described in subdivision (b) with respect to the requirements in subdivision (a). Only if the county public hospital health system or affiliated governmental entity so chooses, the requirements in this section shall apply. Notwithstanding any other law, the state shall not assess the fee described in subdivision (d) of Section 14301.4, or any other similar fee. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a county public hospital health system to provide the nonfederal share for expenditures for purposes other than those described in subdivision (a), or for expenditures that are otherwise for Medi-Cal managed care beneficiaries who do not receive services in the county public
 hospital health system. 

(2) Within 12 months following the end of each fiscal year, a county public hospital system shall submit data to the department demonstrating the payments received from Medi-Cal managed care plans as required under subdivision (a). If the amount of the applicable intergovernmental transfer provided by a county public hospital system does not equal the nonfederal share of those payments, the county hospital system and the department shall adjust the amount of the intergovernmental transfer accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 24, Sec. 2.   (AB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Clinic Workforce Stabilization Retention Payment Program [14199.70. - 14199.76.]

14199.70.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Qualified clinics, as defined in this article, are fundamental to the California health care safety net, as their mission is to provide primary and preventive care to low-income and underserved populations.

(b) Stability in the California qualified clinic workforce will further the Legislature’s efforts to manage the COVID-19 pandemic and address other public health issues that face Californians.

(c) Retention payments will help retain qualified health care workers, in particular registered nurses, licensed vocational nurses, licensed clinical social workers, licensed
 mental health workers, medical assistants, and advanced practice professionals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 738, Sec. 19.   (AB 204)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.71.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Date of record” means a date determined by the department on which eligible employees are deemed to qualify for a retention payment, which shall be no later than 90 calendar days after the effective date of the act that added this article.

(b) “Department” means the State Department of Health Care Services.

(c) “Eligible employee” means a person who is employed by an eligible qualified clinic as of the date of record and is not a manager or supervisor, as defined in this article.

(d) “HCAI” means the
 Department of Health Care Access and Information.

(e) “Manager or supervisor” means a qualified clinic employee who meets all of the following criteria:

(1) Whose duties and responsibilities involve the management of the enterprise in which they are employed or of a customarily recognized department or subdivision thereof.

(2) Who customarily and regularly directs the work of two or more other employees of the enterprise in which they are employed or of a customarily recognized department or subdivision of that enterprise.

(3) Who has the authority to hire or fire other employees, or their suggestions and recommendations as to the hiring or firing and as to the advancement and promotion or any other change of status of other employees will be given
 particular weight.

(4) Who customarily and regularly exercises discretion and independent judgment.

(5) Who is primarily engaged in duties that meet the test of the exemption. The activities constituting exempt work and nonexempt work shall be construed in the same manner as those items are construed in the following regulations under the Fair Labor Standards Act effective as of the date of this section: Sections 541.102, 541.104-111, and 541.115-116 of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Exempt work shall include, for example, all work that is directly and closely related to exempt work and work that is properly viewed as a means for carrying out exempt functions. The work actually performed by the employee during the course of the workweek shall, first and foremost, be examined and the amount of time the employee spends on that work, together with the employer’s
 realistic expectations and the realistic requirements of the job, shall be considered in determining whether the employee satisfies this requirement.

(6) Who must earn a monthly salary equivalent to no less than two times the state minimum wage for full-time employment. “Full-time employment” is defined in subdivision (c) of Section 515 of the Labor Code as 40 hours per week.

(f) “Qualified clinic” means, and is inclusive of, FQHCs, FQHC look-alikes, free clinics, Indian health clinics, intermittent clinics, and rural health clinics, as defined in this subdivision. A qualified clinic shall be located in the State of California, with the exception of Tribal FQHCs and Indian health clinics, as specified in the definitions of FQHC and Indian health clinic set forth in this subdivision.

(1) “Federally qualified health
 center” or “FQHC” means any community or public federally qualified health center, including Tribal FQHCs, as defined in Section 1396d(l)(2)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as well as FQHC look-alikes. This definition also covers Tribal FQHCs on tribal land adjacent to California in a neighboring state that provides services to American Indians and their families who reside in California.

(2) “FQHC look-alike” means an organization that does not receive an FQHC award, but is designated by the United States Health Resources and Services Administration as meeting FQHC program requirements, as set forth in Sections 1395x(aa)(4)(B) and 1396d(l)(2)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code. For the purposes of this article, an FQHC look-alike is considered an FQHC and all references to FQHCs apply with equal force to FQHC look-alikes.

(3) “Free clinic” means a facility meeting
 the definition set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) “Indian health clinic” means a health clinic that provides services to American Indians and their families who reside in California pursuant to the Indian Health Program, as set forth in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 124575) of Part 4 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code, and Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 1 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations. This definition also covers Indian health clinics on tribal land adjacent to California in a neighboring state that provides services to American Indians and their families who reside in California.

(5) “Intermittent clinic” means a facility meeting the definition set forth in subdivision (h) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code that has been added to
 the provider master file pursuant to Section 14043.15 under the license of a clinic defined in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive.

(6) “Rural health clinic” or “RHC” means a facility meeting the definition set forth in Section 1396d(l)(1) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 738, Sec. 19.   (AB 204)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.72.

(a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature of funds for this purpose, the department shall establish a clinic workforce stabilization retention payment program to provide funds to eligible qualified clinics to make retention payments to their eligible employees for the public purposes specified in Section 14199.70.

(b) The department shall determine the conditions and data reporting requirements for qualified clinics to be eligible to receive funds. Within 90 days of the effective date of the act that added this article, the department shall notify all qualified clinics of those conditions and requirements, as well as the relevant portions of this article, including, but not limited to, the date of record set by the department, the information qualified clinics
 are required to submit pursuant to subdivision (c), the methodology for calculation of funds to be distributed pursuant to subdivision (d), how to pay retention payments pursuant to subdivision (e), and the consequences of noncompliance pursuant to Section 14199.74.

(c) (1) Each qualified clinic that intends to request funding shall submit the following information to the department no later than 30 days after the date of record:

(A) The name and mailing address of each eligible employee.

(B) The employee’s professional license, certification, or registration, if applicable.

(C) Any other information as required by the department for purposes of implementing this article.

(2) The possession of a professional license, certification, or registration is not required for an employee to be eligible for a payment. All eligible employees, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 14199.71, are eligible to receive payments.

(3) The information required by this section shall include an attestation, made under penalty of perjury, that the qualified clinic employee did not receive funds pursuant to the Hospital and Skilled Nursing Facility COVID-19 Retention Pay program set forth in Part 4.6 (commencing with Section 1490) of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(d) The department shall distribute funds to each eligible qualified clinic based on the total number of eligible employees reported pursuant to subdivision (c). The amount of the payment shall be up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per eligible employee, subject to available funding, and reduced
 on a pro rata basis if the requests exceed the amount of funds available. The department may distribute these funds to eligible qualified clinics using the existing Medi-Cal Checkwrite system.

(e) Within 60 days of receipt of funds from the department, a qualified clinic shall pay eligible employees a retention payment in the amount of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) if no pro rata reduction is made pursuant to subdivision (d), or the pro rata reduced amount if a pro rata reduction is made pursuant to subdivision (d). An eligible employee who leaves employment between the date of record and the date a qualified clinic pays retention payments shall not be eligible for retention payments. Each qualified clinic that receives funds shall attest, in a form and manner specified by the department, and under penalty of perjury, that all funding received pursuant to this section, with the exception of any funding requested for eligible employees who
 left employment after the date of record, was provided to eligible employees within 60 days of receipt from the department. Each qualified clinic that receives funds shall immediately return to the department any funding received pursuant to this section that is not distributed within the timeline set forth in this subdivision, including funds that the department provided for eligible employees who left employment after the date of record.

(f) The department shall post on its internet website the amount each clinic site received, and the total number of eligible employees reported by each clinic pursuant to subdivision (c).

(g) A qualified clinic shall not use retention payment funding to supplant other payments from the qualified clinic to eligible employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 40, Sec. 72.   (SB 159)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.73.

(a) (1) Except as required by federal law, any payment made pursuant to this article shall be exempt from any adjustments or deductions made to Medi-Cal payments to qualified clinics, including, but not limited to, provider withholds or provider payment reductions.

(2) Payments made pursuant to this article to qualified clinics shall not be considered payments for patient care or medical services.

(3) The HCAI, in consultation with appropriate stakeholders, shall release guidance to instruct qualified clinics how to report this revenue through the established clinical annual utilization reports, as required under Section 1216 of the Health and Safety
 Code.

(b) The department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis for purposes of implementing this article. A contract entered into or amended pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and from the State Administrative and State Contracting manuals, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this article, in whole or in part, by means of information
 notices or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(d) This article is a state law within the meaning of Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(e) This article shall be implemented only to the extent that the department determines that federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program is not jeopardized.

(f) Funds distributed to qualified clinics and payments made by those qualified clinics pursuant to this article shall not be factored into any reconciliation process or prospective payment system (PPS) rate calculation, including, but not limited to, the reconciliation process detailed in Section 14132.100 of this code and subdivision (bb) of Section 1396a of Title 42 of the United States Code, to the maximum extent permissible by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 738, Sec. 19.   (AB 204)   Effective September 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.74.

(a) In the event of a dispute as to the status of an employee as an eligible employee, the retention payment amount, or a qualified clinic’s failure to make a retention payment, an eligible employee or a labor organization that represents the employee may write to the qualified clinic and request a review of the employee’s eligibility status, retention payment amount, or the qualified clinic’s failure to make a retention payment. The qualified clinic shall have 30 days to review the request, disclose to the employee the amount received from the department subject to the methodology described in subdivision (e) of Section 14199.72, and cure any alleged deficiency. In the event the qualified clinic cures a deficiency alleged by an employee, the employee shall not be entitled to any further damages or
 other relief.
